Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-948
Retirement benefits;
exemption from taxation and legal process; exception; payment for civil damages; conditions.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, the right of a person to an annuity, an allowance,
or any optional benefit under the School Employees Retirement Act, any other
right accrued or accruing to any person or persons under such act, the various
funds and account created thereby, and all the money, investments, and income
thereof shall be exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local
tax, shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation
of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other process of law whatsoever,
and shall not be assignable except to the extent that such annuity, allowance,
or benefit is subject to a qualified domestic relations order under the Spousal
Pension Rights Act. The payment
of any annuity, allowance, or benefit subject to such order shall take priority
over any payment made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(2) If a member
of the retirement system is convicted of or pleads no contest to a felony
that is defined as assault, sexual assault, kidnapping, child abuse, false
imprisonment, or theft by embezzlement and is found liable for civil damages
as a result of such felony, following distribution of the member's annuity,
allowance, or optional benefit from the retirement system, the court may order
the payment of such annuity, allowance, or optional benefit under the retirement
system for such civil damages, except that the annuities, allowances, or optional
benefits to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the member
or any of his or her beneficiaries shall be exempt from such payment. Any
order for payment of annuities, allowances, or optional benefits shall not
be stayed on the filing of any appeal of the conviction. If the conviction
is reversed on final judgment, all annuities, allowances, or optional benefits
paid as civil damages shall be forfeited and returned to the member. The changes
made to this section by Laws 2012, LB916, shall apply to persons convicted
of or who have pled no contest to such a felony and who have been found liable
for civil damages as a result of such felony prior to, on, or after April
7, 2012.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 53, p. 655;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2953;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 486, p. 857;

Laws 1969, c. 735, § 15, p. 2783;

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 30;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 20;

Laws 1988, LB 1170, § 19;

Laws 1989, LB 506, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 44;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1552;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 583;

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 26;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 34;

Laws 2012, LB916, § 22.

Spousal Pension Rights Act, see section 42-1101.